dev/verb/verb.bn.dix
    <pardef n="গ/োছা__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাচ্ছিলাম</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাচ্ছিল</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছালে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pcnd"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ুছিয়েছেন</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাবে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাল</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ুছিয়ে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppst"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাবি</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাবে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাবে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ুছিয়েছে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাবি</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছালি</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাচ্ছে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছান</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাতে থাকব</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ুছিয়েছিল</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাবেন</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাচ্ছিল</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাব</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ুছিয়েছিল</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাতে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ুছিয়েছিলাম</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছান</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছালে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাস</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাই</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাচ্ছি</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p1"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাচ্ছিলি</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছালেন</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাবে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছানো</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাতেন</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছা</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাবে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাত</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hbtl"/><s n="impers"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাচ্ছিস</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাও</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ুছিয়েছিলেন</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="plprft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাচ্ছিলে</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাচ্ছ</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="cnt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ুছিয়েছিস</l>
          <r>োছা<s n="vblex"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>োছাক</l>

    <e lm="গোছা"><i>গ</i><par n="গ/োছা__vblex"/></e>
